src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-kuulw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - kūlõ: # Verb 49 'eng /est kuulda/fin' - full paradigm
     kūlõ+V+Inf: kūlõ
     kūlõ+V+Ger: kūlõs
     kūlõ+V+Sup: kūlõm
     kūlõ+V+Sup+Ine: kūlõmõs
     kūlõ+V+Sup+Ela: kūlõmõst
     kūlõ+V+Sup+Tra: kūlõmõks
     kūlõ+V+Sup+Abe: kūlõmõt
     kūlõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kūlõb
     kūlõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kūlõt
     kūlõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kūlõbõd
     kūlõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kūliz
     kūlõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [kūlizt, kūliztõ]
     kūlõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [kūlizt, kūliztõ]
     kūlõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: kūl
     kūlõ+V+Cond+Sg3: kūlõks
     kūlõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: kūl
     kūlõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: kūl
     kūlõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: kūlõgid
     kūlõ+V+Jus+Sg3: kūlõg
     kūlõ+V+Quo+Sg3: kūliji
     kūlõ+V+ActPrfPrc: kūlõn
     kūlõ+V+PssPrfPrc: kūldõd
